Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.160

Enforcement of chapter.

All state and county law enforcement officers and all employees and agents of the department shall enforce this chapter.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.44.160. Prior: 1939 c 219 s 16; RRS s 6266-16.]